Arkansas, session 2025, SB273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 9, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-9-106. Dialysis centers — Generators required.
(a) As used in this section, "dialysis center" means a healthcare
facility that furnishes outpatient dialysis services directly to patients
with renal disease.
(b) A dialysis center operating in this state shall have at least one
(1) backup generator on site.










*JMB190*
02/24/2025 10:08:55 AM JMB190